District of Columbia statutes.
42-3402.01

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Conversion of Rental Housing to Condominium or Cooperative Status Act of 1980‘.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 201, 27 DCR 2975

History